solr/contrib/morphlines-core/src/test-files/solr/collection1/conf/hunspell-test.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY abcdefghijklmopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ

SFX A Y 2
SFX A   0     e         n
SFX A   0     e         t

SFX C Y 2
SFX C   0     d/C       c
SFX C   0     c         b

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0     s         o
